src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/N-cieqkhkhes_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - cieʹǩǩes e-stem pöly: # Noun "pykälä (korvamerkissä)" - full paradigm
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Nom: ciẹʹǩǩes
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Gen: ceäkˈkaz
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Acc: ceäkˈkaz
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Ill: ceäkˈksa
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Loc: ceäkˈksest
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Com: ceäkˈksin
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Ess: ceäkˈksen
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Par: ceäkˈksed
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Abe: [ceäkˈkaztaa, ceäkˈkaztää]
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Nom: ceäkˈkaz
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Gen: ceäkˈksi
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Acc: ceäkˈksid
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Ill: ceäkˈksid
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Loc: ceäkˈksin
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Com: ceäkˈksivuiʹm
     cieʹǩǩes+N+Pl+Abe: [ceäkˈksitaa, ceäkˈksitää]
